Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.2, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 305, O.S.L. 2023 (22 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 60.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 60.2. A. A victim of domestic abuse, a victim of
stalking, a victim of harassment, a victim of rape, any adult or
emancipated minor household member on behalf of any other family or
household member who is a minor or incompetent, any minor age
sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years, or any adult victim of a crime

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

may seek relief under the provisions of the Protection from Domestic
Abuse Act.
1. The person seeking relief may file a petition for a
protective order with the district court in the county in which the
victim resides, the county in which the defendant resides, or the
county in which the domestic violence occurred any county in this
state. If the person seeking relief is not a family or household
member or an individual who is or has been in a dating relationship
with the defendant, the person seeking relief must file a complaint
against the defendant with the proper law enforcement agency before
filing a petition for a protective order with the district court.
The person seeking relief shall provide a copy of the complaint that
was filed with the law enforcement agency at the full hearing if the
complaint is not available from the law enforcement agency. Failure
to provide a copy of the complaint filed with the law enforcement
agency shall constitute a frivolous filing and the court may assess
attorney fees and court costs against the plaintiff pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subsection C of this section. The filing of a
petition for a protective order shall not require jurisdiction or
venue of the criminal offense if either the plaintiff or defendant
resides in the county. If a petition has been filed in an action
for divorce or separate maintenance and either party to the action
files a petition for a protective order in the same county where the
action for divorce or separate maintenance is filed, the petition
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for the protective order may be heard by the court hearing the
divorce or separate maintenance action if:
a. there is no established protective order docket in
such court, or
b. the court finds that, in the interest of judicial
economy, both actions may be heard together; provided,
however, the petition for a protective order,
including, but not limited to, a petition in which
children are named as petitioners, shall remain a
separate action and a separate order shall be entered
in the protective order action. Protective orders may
be dismissed in favor of restraining orders in the
divorce or separate maintenance action if the court
specifically finds, upon hearing, that such dismissal
is in the best interests of the parties and does not
compromise the safety of any petitioner.
If the defendant is a minor child, the petition shall be filed
with the court having jurisdiction over juvenile matters.
2. When the abuse occurs when the court is not open for
business, such person may request an emergency temporary order of
protection as authorized by Section 40.3 of this title.
B. The petition forms shall be provided by the clerk of the
court. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a
standard form for the petition.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this section, no filing
fee, service of process fee, attorney fees, or any other fee or
costs shall be charged the plaintiff or victim at any time for
filing a petition for a protective order whether a protective order
is granted or not granted. The court may assess court costs,
service of process fees, attorney fees, other fees, and filing fees
against the defendant at the hearing on the petition, if a
protective order is granted against the defendant; provided, the
court shall have authority to waive the costs and fees if the court
finds that the party does not have the ability to pay the costs and
fees.
2. If the court makes specific findings that a petition for a
protective order has been filed frivolously and no victim exists,
the court may assess attorney fees and court costs against the
plaintiff.
D. The person seeking relief shall prepare the petition or, at
the request of the plaintiff, the court clerk or the victim-witness
coordinator, victim support person, and court case manager shall
prepare or assist the plaintiff in preparing the petition.
E. The person seeking a protective order may further request
the exclusive care, possession, or control of any animal owned,
possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner,
defendant, or minor child residing in the residence of the
petitioner or defendant. The court may order the defendant to make
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

no c ontact with the animal and forbid the defendant from taking,
transferring, encumbering, concealing, molesting, attacking,
striking, threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing of the
animal.
F. A court may not require the victim to seek legal sanctions
against the defendant including, but not limited to, divorce,
separation, paternity, or criminal proceedings prior to hearing a
petition for protective order.
G. A victim of rape, forcible sodomy, a sex offense,
kidnapping, assault and battery with a deadly weapon, child abuse,
or member of the immediate family of a victim of first-degree
murder, as such terms are defined in Section 40 of this title, may
petition, or have a petition filed on the victim’s behalf if the
victim is a minor, for an emergency temporary order or emergency ex
parte order regardless of any relationship or scenario pursuant to
the provisions of this section. The Administrative Office of the
Courts shall modify the petition forms as necessary to effectuate
the provisions of this subsection.
H. Notice shall be given by a sheriff or deputy sheriff. A
plaintiff may elect to contract a person licensed to make service of
process if relief is sought outside of the county in which a
plaintiff or defendant resides or the county in which the alleged
event occurred pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of this

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sect ion. Any costs associated with relief sought under this
subsection shall be paid by the requesting party.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1926 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)